Massachusetts, session 194th, S2955.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 37H of Chapter 71 as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition is 
hereby amended by inserting after subsection (g) the following:- 
(h) Any rules related to student dress or grooming included in a school district or charter 
school’s code of student conduct or otherwise adopted by the school district or charter school 
shall (1) make no distinction, discrimination, or restriction on account of sex or gender identity 
(2) not treat students differently or have a disparate impact on any student based on that student’s 
race, national origin, religion, disability, age, sexual orientation, or gender identity (3) be clear, 
specific, and objective in defining terms, if used; (4) prohibit any school district or charter school 
employee from enforcing any rules related to student grooming and dress by direct physical 
contact with a student or a student's attire; and (5) prohibit any school district or charter school 
employee from requiring a student to undress in front of any other individual, including the 
enforcing school district or charter school employee, to comply with the rules related to dress or 
grooming. Nothing in this section shall limit the rights students are already permitted under 

of 2 14 Chapter 71, Section 82 of 21 Massachusetts General Laws or any other state or federal laws 
relating to a student’s right to freedom of expression. 
SECTION 2. Section 37H ¾ of Chapter 71 as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition is 
hereby amended by inserting as the last sentence of subsection (a) the following -: In addition to 
any rights students may have, in no cases may a school district or charter school suspend or expel 
a student solely on the basis of an alleged violation of rules related to student dress and 
grooming, provided however that a school district or charter school may require students to wear 
clothing of a specific color, and provided further that nothing herein shall limit school districts or 
charter school from taking action to prevent bullying of any student as defined in M.G.L Chapter 
70, section 370 or harassment of any student on account of race, color, sex, gender identity, 
religion, national origin, or sexual orientation. 
SECTION 3. The changes detailed in Sections 1 and 2 shall take effect 60 days after 
passage of this act. 
SECTION 4. The Department of Elementary and Secondary Education shall adopt, 
promulgate, amend and rescind rules and regulations or formulate policies and recommendations 
as necessary, including training, to effectuate the purpose of Sections 1 and 2.